Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.075

Director and employees business interest prohibited.

While employed with the department, the director and employees who administer, regulate, or enforce real estate laws and rules must relinquish interest in any real estate business regulated by this chapter. If any real estate licensee is employed by the director as an employee, the license of the broker, real estate firm, or managing broker is placed on inactive status and remains inactive until the cessation of employment with the director.

[ 2008 c 23 s 4; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 4; 1953 c 235 s 3; 1951 c 222 s 4; 1945 c 111 s 1, part; 1941 c 252 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8340-28, part. Formerly RCW 18.85.050.]